Texas, session 891, SB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Article 49.10, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Subsection (e-1) to read as follows: (e-1)  This subsection expires April 1, 2027. Notwithstanding Subsections (c) and (e) and Subchapter F, Chapter 264, Family Code, for each body that is the subject of an inquest by a justice of the peace, the justice may certify that an autopsy is not necessary if: (1)  the justice determines by clear and convincing evidence that: (A)  the cause of death was the result of injuries sustained as a result of a natural disaster; and (B)  the death was not caused by an unlawful act or omission; and (2)  a person described by Article 49.33(a) is not otherwise seeking an autopsy, regardless of the person's listed priority for purposes of that subsection. SECTION 2.  Article 49A.063, Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1610, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective April 1, 2027, is amended by adding Subsection (c-1) to read as follows: (c-1)  Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c) and Subchapter F, Chapter 264, Family Code, for each body that is the subject of an inquest by a justice of the peace, the justice may certify that an autopsy is not necessary if: (1)  the justice determines by clear and convincing evidence that: (A)  the cause of death was the result of injuries sustained as a result of a natural disaster; and (B)  the death was not caused by an unlawful act or omission; and (2)  a person described by Article 49A.203(a) is not otherwise seeking an autopsy, regardless of the person's listed priority for purposes of that subsection. SECTION 3.  Subchapter A, Chapter 27, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 27.0055 to read as follows: Sec. 27.0055.  EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN JUSTICES OF THE PEACE. (a)  This section applies only to a justice of the peace of a county not served by a medical examiner. (b)  The Department of State Health Services, in collaboration with the Texas Division of Emergency Management, shall develop a training program for justices of the peace on managing mass fatality events. The training program must include: (1)  decision-making protocols for ordering an autopsy; (2)  standards for identifying and documenting bodies; and (3)  best practices on: (A)  collecting and reporting data regarding missing persons; (B)  coordinating efforts with multiple governmental agencies during mass fatality events; and (C)  providing real-time status updates and notifications for close relatives of a victim of a mass fatality. (c)  For purposes of removal under Chapter 87, Local Government Code, "incompetency" in the case of a justice of the peace includes the failure of the justice to successfully complete within one year after the date the justice is first elected the training program developed under this section. SECTION 4.  Section 411.1236, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.1236.  ACCESS TO CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION: TEXAS COMMISSION ON FIRE PROTECTION. (a) The Texas Commission on Fire Protection is entitled to obtain as provided by Subsection (a-1) [from the department] criminal history record information [maintained by the department] that relates to a person who is: (1)  an applicant for or holder of a license issued under Subchapter M, Chapter 418, or Chapter 419; or (2)  an applicant for employment by or an employee of the commission. (a-1)  Subject to Sections 411.087 and 418.459 and consistent with the public policy of this state, the Texas Commission on Fire Protection is entitled to: (1)  obtain through the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history record information maintained or indexed by that bureau that pertains to an applicant for or holder of a license issued under Subchapter M, Chapter 418; and (2)  obtain from the department or any other criminal justice agency in this state criminal history record information maintained by the department or that criminal justice agency that relates to a person described by Subsection (a). (b)  The Texas Commission on Fire Protection may not release or disclose to any person criminal history record information obtained from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under Subsection (a-1)(1). Criminal history record information obtained by the Texas Commission on Fire Protection under Subsection (a-1)(2) [(a)] may not be released to any person or agency except on court order or with the consent of the person who is the subject of the criminal history record information, or as provided by Subsection (c). (c)  The Texas Commission on Fire Protection is not prohibited from disclosing criminal history record information obtained under Subsection (a-1)(2) in a criminal proceeding or in a hearing conducted by the commission or by the State Office of Administrative Hearings on behalf of the commission [if the information is entered into evidence by the board in an administrative, civil, or criminal hearing under Chapter 419]. (d)  The Texas Commission on Fire Protection shall destroy criminal history record information that is obtained under this section after the information is used for its authorized purpose. SECTION 5.  Subchapter F, Chapter 411, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 411.14104 to read as follows: Sec. 411.14104.  ACCESS TO CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION: TEXAS DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT.  (a)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management is entitled to obtain criminal history record information as provided by Subsection (b) that relates to a person who registers as a volunteer for governmental disaster response or recovery operations under Subchapter N, Chapter 418. (b)  Subject to Sections 411.087 and 418.485 and consistent with the public policy of this state, the Texas Division of Emergency Management is entitled to obtain from the department or any other criminal justice agency in this state criminal history record information maintained by the department or that criminal justice agency that relates to a person described by Subsection (a). (c)  Criminal history record information obtained by the Texas Division of Emergency Management under Subsection (b) may not be released or disclosed to any person except on court order or as provided by Subsection (d). (d)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management is not prohibited from disclosing criminal history record information obtained under Subsection (b) in a criminal proceeding. (e)  The Texas Division of Emergency Management shall destroy criminal history record information that is obtained under this section after the information is used for its authorized purpose. SECTION 6.  Sections 418.005(a) and (b), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to: (1)  an elected law enforcement officer [or county judge,] or an appointed public officer of the state or of a political subdivision, who has management or supervisory responsibilities and: (A)  whose position description, job duties, or assignment includes emergency management responsibilities; or (B)  who plays a role in emergency preparedness, response, or recovery; [and] (2)  an emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015(c); (3)  a county judge; (4)  a sheriff; and (5)  a mayor of a municipality that is not covered by a county's hazard mitigation plan [by the emergency management director of a county with a population of 500,000 or more]. (b)  Each person described by Subsection (a) shall complete a course of training provided or approved by the division of not less than 16 [three] hours regarding the responsibilities of state and local governments under this chapter every two years.  The initial course of training must be completed not later than the 180th day after the date the person: (1)  takes the oath of office, if the person is required to take an oath of office to assume the person's duties as a public officer; (2)  otherwise assumes responsibilities as a public officer, if the person is not required to take an oath of office to assume the person's duties; or (3)  is designated as an emergency management coordinator under Section 418.1015(c). SECTION 7.  Section 418.1015, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsections (e), (f), and (g) to read as follows: (e)  If a disaster is imminent or occurring or has recently occurred and the presiding officer of the governing body of a county is not able to act as emergency management director for the county because the presiding officer is absent from the county, incapacitated, deceased, or otherwise unavailable, the following persons in the following order of priority, as available, are designated as the emergency management director for the county for purposes of the disaster until the presiding officer becomes available: (1)  the sheriff; or (2)  the county commissioner with the longest period of continuous service on the commissioners court. (f)  If a disaster is imminent or occurring or has recently occurred and the presiding officer of the governing body of an incorporated city is not able to act as emergency management director for the city because the presiding officer is absent from the city, incapacitated, deceased, or otherwise unavailable, the following persons in the following order of priority, as available, are designated as the emergency management director for the city for purposes of the disaster until the presiding officer becomes available: (1)  the mayor pro tempore of the city; (2)  if an elected position, the marshal of the city; or (3)  the member of the governing body of the city with the longest period of continuous service on the governing body. (g)  Each county and incorporated city by order, ordinance, or other measure shall adopt procedures to implement Subsection (e) or (f), as applicable. SECTION 8.  Section 418.106, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsections (b-1), (f), and (g) to read as follows: (b-1)  In a county with a population of 68,750 or less, a local or interjurisdictional emergency management agency's emergency management plan must include procedures to establish a unified incident command structure for the county and any municipality located in the county. (f)  Except as provided by Subsection (g), each local or interjurisdictional emergency management agency shall annually conduct a drill on the agency's emergency management plan. The division shall supervise all emergency management plan drills. (g)  If a political subdivision served by a local or interjurisdictional emergency management agency is included in a disaster declaration issued by the governor under Section 418.014 or by the president of the United States, the local or interjurisdictional emergency management agency is not required to conduct a drill on the agency's emergency management plan for one year from the date the declaration is initially issued. SECTION 9.  Subchapter E, Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 418.1103 to read as follows: Sec. 418.1103.  POST-DISASTER AFTER-ACTION REPORT. (a) A local or interjurisdictional emergency management agency for an area that is wholly or partly the subject of a disaster declaration by the governor under this chapter or by the president of the United States shall: (1)  complete a post-disaster after-action report on a form prescribed by the division not later than the 60th day after the date a disaster declaration expires or is terminated; and (2)  submit the report to the division. (b)  The division shall adopt the post-disaster after-action report form required to be completed and submitted under this section. SECTION 10.  Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapters M and N to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER M. EMERGENCY MANAGER LICENSES Sec. 418.451.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Fire Protection. (2)  "Emergency manager" means a person who holds an emergency manager license under this subchapter. (3)  "Emergency manager license" means a license issued under this subchapter and includes a bridge, basic, intermediate, advanced, or master license. Sec. 418.452.  ADMINISTRATOR; RULES; FEES. (a) The commission shall administer and enforce this subchapter. (b)  The commission may adopt rules to implement this subchapter.  The division shall adopt rules regarding the minimum requirements for each type of license and the minimum requirements for the continuing education necessary to renew an emergency manager license in order to implement this subchapter. (c)  The commission may adopt fees reasonable and necessary to cover the costs of administering this subchapter. Sec. 418.453.  DATABASE OF LICENSE HOLDERS. (a) The commission, in coordination with the division, shall establish and maintain records of each person who holds an emergency manager license, including whether the license is valid and whether any disciplinary proceeding is pending. (b)  The commission shall make the records under this section available to an emergency management director or the director's associated governmental entity on request. Sec. 418.454.  ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The division may establish an advisory committee to provide recommendations on the implementation of this subchapter, including on the policies, standards, and curriculum adopted under this subchapter. (b)  If established, the committee consists of nine members appointed by the division chief or the chief's designee and must contain at least one emergency manager and a representative of a governmental entity that employs or is associated with an emergency manager. (c)  Chapter 2110 does not apply to the advisory committee. Sec. 418.455.  LICENSING REQUIREMENT. A person may not serve as an emergency management coordinator under Section 418.1015(c) for a period that exceeds six months beginning the day after the date on which the person was designated as an emergency management coordinator, unless the person holds an emergency manager license. Sec. 418.456.  ELIGIBILITY FOR EMERGENCY MANAGER LICENSE; ISSUANCE. (a) To be eligible for an emergency manager license, a person must: (1)  submit an application to the commission in a form and manner prescribed by the commission; (2)  demonstrate that the person meets eligibility criteria under Section 418.457; and (3)  not be disqualified based on the person's criminal history, as described by Section 418.458. (b)  The commission shall issue a bridge, basic, intermediate, advanced, or master emergency manager license, as appropriate, to an applicant who meets the eligibility requirements prescribed by Subsection (a). Sec. 418.457.  EMERGENCY MANAGER LICENSES. (a)  To be eligible for a bridge emergency manager license, a person must complete not less than 40 hours of training and instruction on emergency management, which must consist of courses provided or approved by division rule. (b)  The division by rule shall establish the minimum eligibility requirements for basic, intermediate, advanced, and master emergency manager licenses, including any minimum hours of training and instruction or years of experience performing the duties of an emergency management coordinator. Sec. 418.458.  INELIGIBILITY BASED ON CRIMINAL HISTORY. (a) A person is not eligible for an emergency manager license if the person has been convicted or placed on deferred adjudication community supervision for: (1)  a felony; or (2)  any offense that directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of an emergency management coordinator, as determined by the commission. (b)  The commission, in consultation with the division, may adopt rules specifying offenses, other than those described by Subsection (a), a conviction or placement on deferred adjudication community supervision for which would disqualify a person as not eligible for an emergency manager license. Sec. 418.459.  AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK. (a) The commission may conduct a criminal history check, including a check of any criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in the manner provided by Subchapter F, Chapter 411, on each person who applies for an emergency manager license. (b)  For purposes of conducting the criminal history check, the commission may require an applicant to submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the commission, to the commission or to the department for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the department and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (c)  The commission may require the applicant to pay a fee to cover any costs associated with conducting a criminal history check under this section. Sec. 418.460.  ALTERNATIVE QUALIFICATIONS. The division by rule may allow an applicant for an emergency manager license to credit military experience, professional experience, education, or another certification toward the eligibility requirements of Section 418.457, including an emergency management credential issued by another state. Sec. 418.461.  PROVISION OR APPROVAL OF TRAINING REQUIRED. The division shall provide or approve training, instruction, and courses sufficient to enable a person to meet the licensing and continuing education requirements under this subchapter. Sec. 418.462.  EXPIRATION; CONTINUING EDUCATION; RENEWAL. (a) An emergency manager license expires on the first anniversary of the date the license is issued. (b)  The commission shall renew an emergency manager license if an emergency manager: (1)  completes not less than 16 hours of continuing education on emergency management provided or approved by division rule; and (2)  submits an application for renewal to the commission on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commission. (c)  The commission by rule may adopt a system under which licenses expire on various dates during the year. Sec. 418.463.  DENIAL; SUSPENSION; REVOCATION. (a) The commission may deny the issuance or renewal of an emergency manager license or suspend or revoke an emergency manager license if a person violates this subchapter or any rule adopted by the division or commission under this subchapter, including being disqualified based on the person's criminal history. (b)  A proceeding under this section is a contested case under Chapter 2001. SUBCHAPTER N. STATEWIDE VOLUNTEER MANAGEMENT SYSTEM Sec. 418.481.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Local government" means a municipality, a county, a special district or authority, or any other political subdivision of this state. (2)  "Volunteer management system" means the online volunteer registration and management database established under this subchapter. Sec. 418.482.  ESTABLISHMENT OF SYSTEM. The division shall establish and maintain a statewide volunteer registration and management database to register, credential, and manage individuals who volunteer to assist in disaster response or recovery operations at the direction and under the supervision of a state agency or local government. Sec. 418.483.  SYSTEM REQUIREMENTS. The volunteer management system must: (1)  be made available online; (2)  be maintained and updated regularly with a roster of available volunteers; (3)  be capable of making and coordinating volunteer assignments among state, regional, and local governmental entities; and (4)  document the supervision of volunteers and the resources available and necessary to support the volunteers. Sec. 418.484.  USE OF SYSTEM REQUIRED; LIMITATIONS ON REQUIRED REGISTRATION. (a) In this section: (1)  "Community organization active in disaster" is a nonprofit organization that regularly engages in disaster response and recovery operations and regularly prepares for those operations. (2)  "Spontaneous volunteer" means an individual who: (A)  volunteers to assist in disaster response or recovery; and (B)  is not affiliated with voluntary organizations active in disaster or any community organization active in disaster or with a governmental entity. (3)  "Voluntary organizations active in disaster" is a network of nonprofit organizations that coordinate to provide disaster response or recovery services and may include community organizations active in disaster. (b)  The division and each state agency and local government that deploys volunteers in disaster response or recovery operations shall use the volunteer management system to: (1)  credential and deploy the volunteers; (2)  report in the system volunteer activity and requests for assistance during periods when a disaster declaration is in effect; and (3)  coordinate volunteer programs by local governments to ensure the programs align with state standards and requirements. (c)  Before the division, a state agency, or a local government deploys a spontaneous volunteer to assist in disaster response or recovery operations, the division, state agency, or local government, as applicable, must ensure the spontaneous volunteer is registered with the volunteer management system. An individual who volunteers and is affiliated with a community organization active in disaster or a member or affiliate organization of voluntary organizations active in disaster may not be required to register with the voluntary management system before deployment. (d)  The division may waive, wholly or partly, any requirement of this section as necessary to facilitate an urgent response to a disaster. Sec. 418.485.  AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK. The division may conduct a criminal history check, based on the criminal history record information maintained by the department or any other criminal justice agency in this state, on each person who applies to register as a volunteer under this subchapter. Sec. 418.486.  INELIGIBILITY TO REGISTER BASED ON CRIMINAL HISTORY. The division may adopt rules for the denial of a person's application to register in the volunteer management system based on the person's criminal history and for purposes of ensuring public safety and operational integrity. Sec. 418.487.  RULES. The division shall adopt rules for implementing this subchapter, including: (1)  registration and renewal requirements for volunteer registrations; (2)  training and credentialing requirements for particular disaster response or recovery operations that involve specialized training or experience; (3)  procedures for conducting a criminal history check under Section 418.485; and (4)  protocols for deploying volunteers and reporting incidents. Sec. 418.488.  FUNDS; GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS.  (a)  The division may use any available funds to implement this subchapter. (b)  The division may seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations to implement this subchapter. Sec. 418.489.  AGREEMENTS. The division may enter into an agreement with any public or private entity to support volunteer mobilization efforts. Sec. 418.490.  PROPERTY RIGHTS PROTECTED. Nothing in this subchapter may be construed as prohibiting a real property owner from: (1)  consenting to allowing a volunteer onto the owner's property; or (2)  accepting assistance from the volunteer. SECTION 11.  Chapter 423, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 423.010 to read as follows: Sec. 423.010.  AUTHORITY TO NEUTRALIZE UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OPERATING IN DISASTER AREA. (a)  In this section: (1)  "Disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004. (2)  "Disaster area" means a county any part of which is subject to: (A)  a disaster declaration issued by: (i)  the president of the United States under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Section 5121 et seq.); (ii)  the governor under Section 418.014; or (iii)  the presiding officer of the governing body of a political subdivision under Section 418.108; or (B)  an emergency evacuation order. (3)  "Neutralize" means to: (A)  cause electronic interference in the functioning of a device for the purpose of disabling the device and may include jamming, hacking, and other similar methods; or (B)  physically capture a device for the purpose of disabling the device. (b)  The Department of Public Safety or the Texas Division of Emergency Management may neutralize an unmanned aircraft operating in a disaster area if: (1)  the unmanned aircraft is being operated by a person other than a governmental entity responding to the disaster; and (2)  the person does not have authorization from a governmental entity to operate the unmanned aircraft in the disaster area. SECTION 12.  The heading to Subchapter CC, Chapter 481, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER CC. SMALL- AND MICRO-BUSINESS DISASTER RECOVERY PROGRAM SECTION 13.  Section 481.451, Government Code, is amended by amending Subdivisions (3), (4), (6), and (7) and adding Subdivision (8) to read as follows: (3)  "Default rate" means the percentage of small- and micro-business disaster recovery loans made that did not meet the payment terms during a period specified by the bank. (4)  "Fund" means the small- and micro-business recovery fund established under Section 481.452. (6)  "Small- and micro-business [Micro-business] disaster recovery loan" or "disaster recovery loan" means a loan made by a participating community development financial institution to small businesses or micro-businesses under the program. (7)  "Program" means the small- and micro-business disaster recovery loan program established under this subchapter. (8)  "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal entity that: (A)  is domiciled in this state or has at least 51 percent of its employees located in this state; (B)  is formed to make a profit; (C)  is independently owned and operated; and (D)  employs more than 20 and fewer than 100 full-time employees. SECTION 14.  The heading to Section 481.452, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 481.452.  SMALL- AND MICRO-BUSINESS RECOVERY FUND. SECTION 15.  Section 481.452(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The small- and micro-business recovery fund is a dedicated account in the general revenue fund. SECTION 16.  The heading to Section 481.453, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 481.453.  POWERS OF BANK IN ADMINISTERING SMALL- AND MICRO-BUSINESS RECOVERY FUND. SECTION 17.  Section 481.454(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The program shall expand access to capital for qualifying small businesses and micro-businesses to create jobs in this state and constitutes a capital access program under Subchapter BB. SECTION 18.  Section 481.455, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 481.455.  PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION.  (a)  The bank, under the program, shall provide zero interest loans to eligible community development financial institutions for purposes of making interest-bearing loans to qualifying small businesses and micro-businesses that have difficulty in accessing capital following a declared disaster. (a-1)  The bank may not provide loans to micro-businesses under this chapter in an amount less than 50 percent of the total amount of all loans provided under the program in a fiscal biennium. (b)  A loan made by an eligible community development financial institution under the program: (1)  must be made to a small business or micro-business that: (A)  is in good standing under the laws of this state; [and] (B)  did not owe delinquent taxes to a taxing unit of this state before the date of the initial issuance of the disaster declaration; (C)  has suffered physical or economic injury as the result of the event leading to the disaster declaration; and (D)  has paid in full any previous loan received under this subchapter; (2)  may not be made to a micro-business that: (A)  has total revenue that exceeds the amount for which no franchise tax is due under Section 171.002(d)(2), Tax Code; (B)  is a franchise; (C)  is a national chain with operations in this state; (D)  is a lobbying firm; or (E)  is a private equity firm or backed by a private equity firm; (3)  may not have an interest rate higher than the prevailing rate for a similar loan in this state; and (4) [(3)]  must meet any other criteria provided by this subchapter. (c)  Payments on small- and micro-business disaster recovery loans shall be made directly to the lending community development financial institutions. (d)  All income received on a loan made by a community development financial institution participating in the program is the property of the financial institution.  Income received on a loan includes the payment of interest by a borrower small business or micro-business and the administrative fees assessed by the community development financial institution. (e)  A community development financial institution participating in the program shall make payments to the bank on the zero interest loans borrowed by the financial institution under the program quarterly, and the bank or this state is not responsible or liable for any defaults in small- and micro-business disaster recovery loans made by the community development financial institution. SECTION 19.  Subchapter CC, Chapter 481, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 481.4555 to read as follows: Sec. 481.4555.  USES OF LOAN. An eligible small business or micro-business may use a loan received under this subchapter to pay the business's payroll costs, including costs related to the continuation of health care benefits for the business's employees. SECTION 20.  Section 481.457(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A community development financial institution participating in the program shall report quarterly to the bank: (1)  the names of small businesses and micro-businesses that have received a disaster recovery loan; (2)  the current balance of all outstanding disaster recovery loans; (3)  the default rate on existing disaster recovery loans; and (4)  any other information the bank requires. SECTION 21.  Section 489.107(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  For the small- and micro-business [small business] disaster recovery loan program, the report must include a general description of each small business and micro-business for which an applicant was awarded a loan from the fund during the preceding fiscal year. SECTION 22.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY EVACUATION PLAN. (a)  The executive commissioner by rule may require a youth camp operator in the emergency evacuation plan the operator develops for a youth camp as required under Section 762.002 to: (1)  specify muster zones for campers and camp staff; (2)  establish procedures to identify and account for each camper affected by the emergency; and (3)  establish procedures to notify and communicate with: (A)  local emergency management services, including the emergency management director or emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015, Government Code, by the political subdivision within which the camp is located; (B)  camp administrative and medical services staff; and (C)  the parents or legal guardians of each camper identified under Subdivision (2). (b)  Notwithstanding Section 141.0025, the department may not grant a waiver from a requirement prescribed under this section. SECTION 23.  Subtitle A, Title 8, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 675 to read as follows: CHAPTER 675.  MASS FATALITY OPERATIONS Sec. 675.001.  DEFINITION.  In this chapter, "department" means the Department of State Health Services. Sec. 675.002.  MASS FATALITY OPERATIONS RAPID RESPONSE TEAM. (a) The department, in collaboration with the Texas Division of Emergency Management, shall establish a mass fatality operations rapid response team that immediately on the occurrence of a mass fatality event assesses the geographic area where the event occurred for the purpose of: (1)  providing information regarding the mass fatality event to public officials and employees who are conducting disaster response or recovery operations, including justices of the peace, emergency management directors and coordinators, and incident commanders; and (2)  facilitating early and appropriate activation of mass fatality management resources. (b)  The team required by Subsection (a) may be established by interlocal contract. Sec. 675.003.  INTEGRATION OF MASS FATALITY OPERATIONS RESPONSE TEAM WITH SEARCH AND RESCUE OR RECOVERY OPERATIONS. Each recognized search and rescue organization or recovery team, law enforcement agency, fire department, including a volunteer fire department, and emergency medical services provider shall coordinate the efforts of the entity with the appropriate mass fatality operations response team when deploying in response to a mass fatality event for the purpose of ensuring coordination during the recovery of human bodies and the use of proper documentation, including chain-of-custody documentation. Sec. 675.004.  INTEGRATION OF MASS FATALITY OPERATIONS RESPONSE TEAM WITH FAMILY ASSISTANCE CENTERS. (a) In this section, "family assistance center" is a facility established by a state agency or local government following a mass fatality event to coordinate the provision of support services and basic assistance to individuals impacted by the mass fatality event, especially close relatives of a victim of the event. (b)  A state agency or local government that establishes a family assistance center following a mass fatality event shall coordinate efforts to provide services at the center with the appropriate mass fatality operations response team. Sec. 675.005.  MASS FATALITY DATA MANAGEMENT SYSTEM. (a) The department shall develop and maintain a centralized fatality tracking system for use when deploying a mass fatality operations response team. (b)  The system must be capable of: (1)  assigning unique case number and incident tagging; (2)  tracking the chain-of-custody for a body and associated personal effects; and (3)  storing in an easily retrievable manner documentation of an autopsy and identification and release of a body. SECTION 24.  Subtitle A, Title 9, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 762 to read as follows: CHAPTER 762.  CAMPGROUND SAFETY Sec. 762.001.  DEFINITIONS.  In this chapter: (1)  "Campground" means: (A)  a commercial property designed to provide cabins for transient overnight guest use; or (B)  a recreational vehicle park, as defined by Section 13.087, Water Code. (2)  "Campground operator" means a person who owns, operates, controls, or supervises a campground, regardless of profit. (3)  "Floodplain" means any area within a 100-year floodplain identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. Section 4001 et seq.). (4)  "Governmental entity" means this state or a state agency or political subdivision of this state. Sec. 762.002.  FLOODPLAIN SAFETY REQUIREMENTS. (a)  The campground operator of a campground located within a floodplain shall: (1)  install and maintain in each campground cabin located within the floodplain an emergency ladder capable of providing access to the cabin's roof; and (2)  develop an emergency evacuation plan for evacuating on issuance of a flash flood warning campground occupants who are at a campground area within the floodplain. (b)  A campground operator shall implement the emergency evacuation plan developed under Subsection (a)(2) on issuance by the National Weather Service of a flash flood warning for an area of the campground. (c)  A campground operator shall send a copy of an emergency evacuation plan developed under Subsection (a)(2) to: (1)  for a campground located in a municipality, the emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015, Government Code, for the municipality, or if a coordinator has not been designated, the emergency management director designated under that section for the municipality; (2)  for a campground located in the unincorporated area of a county, the emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015, Government Code, for the county, or if a coordinator has not been designated, the emergency management director designated under that section for the county; or (3)  for a campground that is a youth camp, as defined by Section 141.002, the department. Sec. 762.003.  FIRE PROTECTION STANDARDS.  (a)  This section does not apply to a campground owned or controlled by a governmental entity. (b)  A campground to which this chapter applies must comply with the National Fire Protection Association 1194, Standard for Recreational Vehicle Parks and Campgrounds, 2021 Edition, other than Sections 1.1.1 and 5.1.1.1. (c)  A governmental entity may adopt a policy, rule, ordinance, or order to regulate environmental health and sanitation, electrical distribution system safety, liquefied petroleum gas storage and dispensing safety, or fire protection only if the policy, rule, ordinance, or order does not impose standards more stringent than the standards imposed under Subsection (b). SECTION 25.  Section 16.062(c), Water Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  The board shall designate representatives from each flood planning region to serve as the initial flood planning group. The initial flood planning group may then designate additional representatives to serve on the flood planning group. The initial flood planning group shall designate additional representatives if necessary to ensure adequate representation from the interests in its region, including the public, counties, municipalities, industries, agricultural interests, environmental interests, small businesses, electric generating utilities, institutions of higher education, river authorities, water districts, and water utilities. The flood planning group shall maintain adequate representation from those interests. In addition, the board, the commission, the General Land Office, the Parks and Wildlife Department, the Department of Agriculture, the State Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the Texas Division of Emergency Management each shall appoint a representative to serve as an ex officio member of each flood planning group. SECTION 26.  (a)  Notwithstanding Section 1A(a), Chapter 5, page 1062, Special Laws, Acts of the 46th Legislature, Regular Session, 1939, or Section 8515.0104, Special District Local Laws Code, as effective April 1, 2027, the Upper Guadalupe River Authority is subject to a limited review under Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act), during the period in which the Sunset Advisory Commission reviews state agencies abolished in 2027 but may not be abolished under that chapter.  In response to the Texas Hill Country floods of July 2025, the limited review must assess the Upper Guadalupe River Authority's: (1)  governance; (2)  management, including disaster preparedness and response; (3)  operating structure; and (4)  compliance with legislative requirements. (b)  After the limited review described by Subsection (a) of this section, the Upper Guadalupe River Authority shall be reviewed as provided by Section 8515.0104, Special District Local Laws Code, as effective April 1, 2027. (c)  This section expires September 1, 2029. SECTION 27.  (a) In this section, "work group" means the statewide meteorological data monitoring work group established by Subsection (b) of this section. (b)  The statewide meteorological data monitoring work group must include a representative of each of the following entities, designated by the executive head of the entity: (1)  the Texas Division of Emergency Management; (2)  the Texas Department of Transportation; (3)  the Texas Water Development Board; (4)  Texas Tech University; (5)  the Center for Water and the Environment at The University of Texas at Austin; (6)  the Water Engineering Research Center at The University of Texas at Arlington; (7)  the office of the state climatologist; and (8)  the Severe Storm Prediction, Education and Evacuation from Disasters Center at Rice University. (c)  As needed, the work group may include representatives from the National Weather Service and river authorities of this state. (d)  The work group shall develop a plan for implementing a statewide system of flood gauges and other meteorological equipment to provide real-time information to state and local entities to inform emergency management decisions. (e)  In developing the plan described by Subsection (d) of this section, the work group shall: (1)  incorporate existing mesoscale networks and other meteorological equipment implemented by members of the work group to create a single data hub through which state and local leaders, institutions of higher education, and the general public may access in real time statewide meteorological data; (2)  identify areas of this state that lack adequate coverage of flood gauges, weather radar, and other meteorological equipment; and (3)  identify projects, including project costs, that address the inadequacies identified in Subdivision (2) of this subsection. (f)  Not later than December 1, 2026, the work group shall submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and each appropriate standing committee of the legislature a copy of the plan developed under this section. (g)  This section expires December 1, 2027. SECTION 28.  Subchapter EE, Chapter 481, Government Code, is repealed. SECTION 29.  A justice of the peace who holds office on the effective date of this Act is not subject to removal as described by Section 27.0055, Government Code, as added by this Act, for failure to successfully complete the required training program until December 1, 2026. SECTION 30.  A person who, on the effective date of this Act, is required to complete the training required by Section 418.005, Government Code, as amended by this Act, shall complete that training not later than the 180th day after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 31.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the Texas Division of Emergency Management shall adopt the post-disaster after-action report form as required by Section 418.1103, Government Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 32.  Not later than May 1, 2026, the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall adopt the rules necessary to implement Section 141.0091, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 33.  (a) Except as otherwise provided by this Act, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. (b)  Section 418.455, Government Code, as added by this Act, takes effect January 1, 2027.